District of Columbia statutes.
7-2361.02

Applicability to volunteer health practitioners.

This chapter applies to volunteer health practitioners registered with a registration system that complies with § 7-2361.04 and who provide health or veterinary services in the District for a host entity while an emergency declaration is in effect.

July 1, 2010, D.C. Law 18-184, § 3, 57 DCR 3655
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act.